District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1039

Repealed

Powers of estate of a deceased or incompetent member.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 40, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1039.
1981 Ed., § 29-1339.